Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2544.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DUAL ENROLLMENT TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment; membership. new text end new text begin (a) The Dual Enrollment Task Force is established and consists of: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education or the commissioner's designee; new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner of education or the commissioner's designee; new text end new text begin (3) the executive director of the P-20 education partnership or the executive director's designee; new text end new text begin (4) two college or university presidents or representatives, one from a two-year institution and one from a four-year institution, with knowledge of dual enrollment financing and designated by the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities; new text end new text begin (5) one representative with knowledge of dual enrollment financing designated by the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota; new text end new text begin (6) one representative designated by the Tribal Nations Education Committee; new text end new text begin (7) one Tribal college president, university president, or representative with knowledge of dual enrollment financing; new text end new text begin (8) the following members appointed by the commissioner of education: new text end new text begin (i) one member of a school district board; new text end new text begin (ii) one member of a charter school board; new text end new text begin (iii) one superintendent; new text end new text begin (iv) one high school principal; new text end new text begin (v) one representative with expertise in Minnesota's education funding mechanisms; new text end new text begin (vi) one high school educator teaching college courses at a high school; new text end new text begin (vii) one high school counselor who advises students enrolled in college courses through the postsecondary enrollment options (PSEO) program; and new text end new text begin (viii) four persons who meet any of the following criteria, two from the Minneapolis-St. Paul metropolitan area and two from greater Minnesota, and two from a "high-needs local educational agency" as defined in United States Code, title 20, section 1021: new text end new text begin (A) a parent of a student who participated in dual enrollment after the 2020-2021 school year; new text end new text begin (B) a student who participated in dual enrollment after the 2020-2021 school year; new text end new text begin (C) a student who successfully completed an online dual enrollment course after the 2020-2021 school year; or new text end new text begin (D) a student who successfully completed a career or technical education course in 10th grade under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.09, subdivision 5a, after the 2020-2021 school year; and new text end new text begin (9) the following members appointed by the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education: new text end new text begin (i) one representative from a nonprofit private postsecondary institution participating in a dual enrollment program; new text end new text begin (ii) one representative from the Office of Higher Education with expertise in Minnesota's education funding mechanisms; new text end new text begin (iii) one faculty member from the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities system who teaches students enrolled in college courses through the PSEO program; and new text end new text begin (iv) one counselor from the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities system who advises students enrolled in college courses through the PSEO program. new text end new text begin (b) Members of the task force must be appointed by July 1, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must: new text end new text begin (1) review the funding formulas under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.09, and their impact on: new text end new text begin (i) high schools, including resource allocation and financial incentives and disincentives; new text end new text begin (ii) public and private postsecondary institutions, particularly regarding the cost and financial sustainability of courses eligible for dual credit; and new text end new text begin (iii) students, with a focus on equitable access and support services; new text end new text begin (2) analyze cost variations among postsecondary institutions, accounting for: new text end new text begin (i) program-specific costs, including for courses with a laboratory requirement or career and technical education courses; new text end new text begin (ii) regional cost differences between urban and rural areas; new text end new text begin (iii) cost differences between large and small institutions; and new text end new text begin (iv) administrative costs; new text end new text begin (3) examine the transparency and accountability of funding under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.09, including: new text end new text begin (i) data collection and reporting on how funds are used; and new text end new text begin (ii) oversight mechanisms to ensure efficient and effective use of funds; new text end new text begin (4) identify barriers to participation caused by the funding formula, particularly for students from rural communities, low-income families, and historically marginalized groups; new text end new text begin (5) develop recommendations for: new text end new text begin (i) adjustments to the funding formula; new text end new text begin (ii) strategies to incentivize high schools to promote participation in dual enrollment programs; new text end new text begin (iii) funding provisions for student support services, including counseling, transportation, and meal access; and new text end new text begin (iv) changes to streamline state administrative processes related to dual enrollment; new text end new text begin (6) analyze the use of asynchronous classes by dual enrollment students, including course passage rates and a cost benefit analysis of that type of course offering; and new text end new text begin (7) identify metrics to evaluate the impact of proposed changes, ensuring recommendations are data driven and measurable. new text end new text begin (b) The task force must report its findings and recommendations to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 and higher education by May 30, 2027, in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 3.195. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Compensation. new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, subdivision 3, governs compensation of the members of the task force. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Meetings and administrative support. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of education must convene the first meeting of the task force no later than August 1, 2026. The task force must appoint a chair and cochair at the first meeting. new text end new text begin (b) The task force must establish a schedule for meetings and meet as necessary to accomplish the duties under subdivision 2. Meetings are subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. The task force may meet by telephone or interactive technology consistent with Minnesota Statutes, section 13D.015. new text end new text begin (c) The Department of Education must provide administrative support to assist the task force in its work, including providing information and technical support, and must assist in the creation of the report under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires on May 30, 2027, or upon submission of the report required under subdivision 2, whichever is later. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; DUAL ENROLLMENT TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Dual Enrollment Task Force. new text end new text begin (a) For the Dual Enrollment Task Force: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end